Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4645.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 37. (1) Offense variable 7 is aggravated physical abuse. Score offense variable 7 by determining which of the following apply and by assigning the number of points attributable to the 1 that has the highest number of points: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 (a) A victim was treated with sadism, torture, excessive brutality, or similarly egregious conduct designed to substantially increase the fear and anxiety a victim suffered during the offense 50 points (b) A companion animal was treated with sadism, torture, excessive brutality, or similarly egregious conduct designed to substantially increase the fear and anxiety a companion animal suffered during the offense 25 points (c) (b) No victim or companion animal was treated with sadism, torture, excessive brutality, or similarly egregious conduct designed to substantially increase the fear and anxiety a victim suffered during the offense 0 points (2) Count Assign points for each person or companion animal who was placed in danger of injury or loss of life. as a victim. (3) As used in this section, "sadism" means conduct that subjects a victim or companion animal to extreme or prolonged pain or humiliation and is inflicted to produce suffering or for the offender's gratification. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 4646 (request no. H02034'25). (b) House Bill No. 4651 (request no. H02052'25).